Hawaii statutes.
§240-1 Electric light and power companies,
tax on. Every person operating in the State an electric light or power
business as a public utility, whose franchise does not provide for the payment
to the county in which the public utility operates of a tax, or a tax of less
than two and one-half per cent, based upon the gross receipts of such person
from all electric light or power furnished to consumers during each calendar
year, shall file with the director of finance of the county in which the public
utility operates, within one month after the expiration of each calendar year,
a detailed statement showing all gross receipts from all electric light or
power furnished to consumers during the preceding calendar year. Such person
shall, at the same time pay to the director of finance, for and on behalf of
such county, in addition to any and all other payments required to be made by
law, two and one-half per cent of the gross receipts; or, if such person's
franchise provides for a tax of less than two and one-half per cent of the
gross proceeds, the difference between the tax required under such franchise
and two and one-half per cent of the gross receipts, of such person from all
electric light or power furnished to consumers during the preceding calendar year.
[L 1937, c 105, pt of §1; RL 1945, pt of §5681; RL 1955, §131-1; HRS §240-1; am
L 1982, c 167, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next